Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2001
Nebraska State Patrol; established; chief officer.

There is hereby established a department to be known as the Nebraska State Patrol. The chief officer of the Nebraska State Patrol shall be the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety, who shall have had at least four years' experience as a law enforcement officer prior to his or her appointment.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 2, p. 507;

Laws 1941, c. 176, § 4, p. 690;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-417;

R.S.1943, § 60-431;

Laws 1967, c. 391, § 1, p. 1215;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-431;

Laws 1981, LB 541, § 1.

Bond and requirements, see section 84-106.